Utah statutes.
35A-1-106.   Fees.

(1)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, the department may adopt a schedule of fees assessed for services provided by the department by following the procedures and requirements of Section 63J-1-504.

(2)  The department shall submit each fee established under this section to the Legislature for its approval as part of the department’s annual appropriations request.

